Washington statutes.
RCW 7.28.190

Verdict where plaintiff's right to possession expires before trial.

If the right of the plaintiff to the possession of the property expire, after the commencement of the action and before the trial, the verdict shall be given according to the fact, and judgment shall be given only for the damages.

[Code 1881 s 542; 1877 p 114 s 546; 1869 p 130 s 494; RRS s 800.]